Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-207
Streets and sidewalks; removal of obstructions; trees; declaration of nuisance; procedure; special assessment.

(1) A city of the first class may by ordinance provide for the removal of all obstructions from the sidewalks, curbstones, gutters, and crosswalks at the expense of the owners or occupants of the grounds fronting thereon or at the expense of the person placing the obstruction and may require and regulate the planting and protection of shade trees in and along the streets and the trimming and removing of the trees.

(2) A city of the first class may by ordinance declare it to be a nuisance for a property owner to permit, allow, or maintain any dead or diseased trees within the right-of-way of streets within the corporate limits of the city or within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction. Notice to abate and remove such nuisance and notice of the right to a hearing and the manner in which it may be requested shall be given to each owner or owner's duly authorized agent and to the occupant, if any. The city shall establish the method of notice by ordinance. If notice is given by first-class mail, such mail shall be conspicuously marked as to its importance. Within five days after receipt of such notice, the owner or occupant of the lot or piece of ground may request a hearing with the city to appeal the decision to abate or remove the nuisance by filing a written appeal with the office of the city clerk. A hearing on the appeal shall be held within fourteen days after the filing of the appeal and shall be conducted by an elected or appointed officer as designated in the ordinance. The hearing officer shall render a decision on the appeal within five business days after the conclusion of the hearing. If the appeal fails, the city may have the work done to abate and remove the dead or diseased trees. If the owner or occupant of the lot or piece of ground does not request a hearing with the city within five days after receipt of such notice or fails to comply with the order to abate and remove the nuisance, the city may have such work done. The city may levy and assess all or any portion of the costs and expenses of the work upon the lot or piece of ground so benefited as a special assessment.

(3) The city may also regulate the building of bulkheads, cellars, basements, ways, stairways, railways, windows, doorways, awnings, lampposts, awning posts, and all other structures projecting upon or over any adjoining excavation through and under the sidewalks in the city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XI, p. 247;

R.S.1913, § 4823;

C.S.1922, § 3991;

C.S.1929, § 16-208;

R.S.1943, § 16-207;

Laws 1994, LB 695, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB266, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 17;

Laws 2016, LB703, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 19.